District of Columbia statutes.
31-4313

Enforcement of Commissioner’s orders or actions.

The Commissioner may, through the Corporation Counsel of the District, invoke the aid of any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce any order made or action taken by him in pursuance of law.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1133, ch. 672, ch. II, § 14
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(i), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-413.
1973 Ed., § 35-413.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4301.